Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.540

Subsequent compensation for property taken or damaged.

If any city has heretofore taken or shall hereafter take possession of any land or other property, or has damaged or shall hereafter damage the same for any of the public purposes mentioned in this chapter, or for any other purpose within the authority of such city or town, without having made just compensation therefor, such city or town may cause such compensation to be ascertained and paid to the persons entitled thereto by proceedings taken in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and the payment of such compensation and costs as shall be adjudged in favor of the persons entitled thereto in such proceedings shall be a defense to any other action for the taking or damaging of such property.

[ 1907 c 153 s 53; RRS s 9278. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 52; 1893 c 84 s 52.]